Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2244XC (4) 91 ss/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 103A.8E Fire protection sprinkler 1 systems. 2 1. The commissioner shall adopt as part of the state 3 building code a prohibition on the installation of a fire 4 protection sprinkler system in a residence consisting of fewer 5 than seven units. 6 2. A local building regulation shall not require the 7 installation of a fire protection sprinkler system in a 8 residence consisting of fewer than seven units. 9